Hawaii statutes.
§147-94 Grading voluntary. The grading
of beef, pork, mutton, and lamb carcasses by trained graders cooperating with
or employed by the department of agriculture shall be voluntary with the
producer or the producer's agent. [L 1955, c 272, §3; RL 1955, §22-92; ren and
am L 1957, c 172, §1(d) and (e); am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132,
§2; HRS §147-94; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next